src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! # The Somali morphophonological/twolc rules file 


 ! ------------------------- !
!! ## Morphophonological notes 
 ! ------------------------- !
    
!! # Phonological Processes in Somali
!!
!! Somali has several phonological alternations involving reduplication, lenition, vowel harmony
!! and tone.
!!
!! The hopes with this documentation is that it will either make twolc rules clearer, or help
!! if it comes time to completely redo all the rules.
    !
!! ## Spreading processes
    !
!! ### Lenition
!!
!! The lenis stop series in Somali <b d g> alternates with the fortis series <t k>, note that
!! the <b> does not actually participate. Lenis stops are found in coda positions, and fortis
!! stops are found elsewhere. The alternation occurs in both nouns and verbs.
!! ```
!!     ilig ‘tooth'   ~   iligga ‘tooth (Def.)'     ~   ilko ‘teeth (Indef.)’
!!     arag ‘see'     ~   aragtaa ‘2Sg/3SgF sees'   ~   arkaa ‘1Sg/3SgM sees’
!! ```
    
!! ### Voicing assimilation
!!   
!! Stops assimilate for voicing (or lenis/fortis), particularly across morpheme boundaries,
!! however they only assimilate if they share place of articulation.
!! ```
!!     aragtaa            ‘2Sg/3SgF sees’
!!
!!     wararka            ‘the news’
!!     buugga             ‘the book’
!!
!!     naagta            ‘the woman’
!!     jaamacadda        ‘the university’
!! ```
!! This also follows for the retroflex segment <dh>, however the sequence <dhdh> is shortened
!! to <dh>.
!! ```
!!     gabadh            ‘(a) girl’
!!     gabadha           ‘the girl’
!! ```
!! ### Vowel ablaut
!!
!! Vowels are subject to two main types of ablaut: (1) full ablaut across back consonants,
!! and (2) partial ablaut with <a> ~ <e> preceding the high vowel <i>.
!!
!! Full ablaut is constrained to morpheme boundaries: and most commonly occurs in the ‘waxa’
!! focus marker.
!! ```
!!     waxaan ‘foc+1Sg'            magac                        rah
!!     wuxuu  ‘foc+3SgM'           magucu    / magacu           ruhu
!!                                 magicii   / magicii 
!! ```
!! Full ablaut appears to be optional in some words.
!!
!! Partial ablaut occurs in verbal infinitives with mostly any word of the pattern CaC. When
!! the infinitive ending <i> is appended, <a> raises to <e>. It also occurs around person
!! suffixes and tense ending in <e>
!! ```
!!     tag ‘go'        tegi ‘to go'            tegeen ‘they went’
!!     bax ‘leave'     bexi ‘to leave'         bexeen ‘they left’
!! ```

!! ## <k> deletion
!! 
!! <k> is deleted when it follows a back consonant (which is not <k> itself):
!! ```
!!     wax + ka => waxa
!!     magac + ka => magaca
!!     rah + ka => raha
!! ```
    !
!! <l> + <t> -> <sh>
!!
!! Occurs only across morpheme boundaries, in verbs and nouns.
!!
!!     wiilal        =>        wiilasha
!!     ‘boys'                  ‘the boys’
    !
!!     maqal        =>        maqashay
!!     ‘listen'            ‘2Sg/3SgF listened’
!!
!!
!! ## Vowel harmony
!!
!! For a complete description of vowel harmony, see the literature.
!!
!! Short summary: +ATR is the active spreading feature, and spreads leftward across all
!! boundaries but is blocked by pauses in speech (Intonation Phrase). +ATR can spread
!! rightward, but stops at the word boundary. It does not cross clitics, typically.
!!
!! Hopefully VH will be covered in this analyzer.
    !
!! ## Tonal Processes
!!
!! In certain environments Somali appears to dislike having two tones immediately next
!! to eachother. I have some collected environments for a phonology paper. May not be
!! super important right off the bat.
    !
!! ## Reduplication
!! 
!! Somali has two kinds of reduplication: partial and full. Reduplication is typically
!! a strategy for marking plural in nouns and adjectives in some declensions, but also
!! appears in verbs as a derivational process. The inflectional processes are quite
!! productive, but the derivational processes are not as productive.
!!
!! Partial reduplication occurs in the 4th declension of nouns, but a subtype of these
!! 4th declensional nouns also has full reduplication. Partial reduplication includes
!! epenthesis of <a>. Note that partial reduplication in adjectives is prefixing,
!! while in nouns it is suffixing. Also, the template is slightly different.
!! ```
!!     af ‘mouth, language'        =>        afaf    ‘... +Pl’
!!     qoys ‘family'               =>        qoysas    ‘... +Pl’
!! ```
!! Note: There may be some partial reduplication that also copies the vowel.
!!
!! Full reduplication also applies to some of these nouns:
!! ```
!!     qof ‘person'                =>         qofqof
!!     cad ‘part'                  =>        cadcad
!! ```
!! Adjectives:
!! ```
!!     quruxsán ‘beautiful'        =>        qurquruxsán ‘ ... +Pl’
!!     fudúd ‘easy, light'         =>        fudfudúd
!!     adág ‘difficult'            =>        ad'adág
!!     yár ‘a little'              =>        yaryára
!!
!!     gaabán ‘short'              =>        gaaggaabán ‘ ... +Pl’
!!     laabán ‘folded'             =>        laallaabán
!!     jabán ‘broken'              =>        ‘jajabán’
!! ```
!! Irregular adjectives:
!! ```
!!     dhéer ‘long, tall (sg)'        =>        dhaadhéer
!!     wéyn ‘big'                     =>        waawéyn
!! ```

!! Note: Other possibilities might be found greping: with ‘^\(.\)aa\1e', ‘^\(.\)aa\1\1aa',
!!      ‘\(.\)a\1$’

!! ## Person morphemes
!! 
!! The realization of personal suffixes on verbs is a little complex and depends mostly on
!! declension type and whether or not the suffix is preceded by the progressive.
!! 
!! Realization of these suffixes is currently all handled by twolc:
!! ```        
!!                     sg            pl                
!!         1          {đ}            {ñ}     ==>        
!!         2          {ŧ}             0                
!!         3 Masc     {đ}            {đ}                
!!         3 Fem      {ŧ}                            
!!
!!         Declension 1
!! 
!!                     sg            pl                    
!!         1            keenaa        keennaa         1        dhacay        dhacnay
!!         2            keentaa       keenaan         2        dhacday        dheceen
!!         3 Masc       keenaa        keentaan        3 Masc    dhacay        dhecdeen
!!         3 Fem        keentaa                       3 Fem    dhacday
    !
!!         Declension 2
!!
!!                     sg            pl                     sg
!!         1            sameeyay    sameynay       1        kariyay        karinay
!!         2            sameysay    sameyseen      2        karisay        kariseen
!!         3 Masc       sameeyay    sameeyeen      3 Masc   kariyay        kariyeen
!!         3 Fem        sameysay                   3 Fem    karisay
    !
!!         Declension 3
    !
!!                     sg            pl                    
!!         1            furay        furannay            1        watay        wadannay
!!         2            furtay       furateen            2        wadatay        wadateen
!!         3 Masc       furay        fureen              3 Masc    watay        wateen
!!         3 Fem        furtay                           3 Fem    wadatay
!! ```
    !
!!     A short summary:
!!
!! ```
!!         %{đ%} - 1Sg, 3SgM and 3Pl;     realized as 0/y/d in classes
!!         %{ŧ%} - 2Sg, 3SgF, 2Pl;        realized as t/s in classes 
!!         %{ñ%} - 1Pl;                   realized as n in all classes
!!                                       ‘special' here just in case.
!! ```

!! This process could easily be removed from twolc and done in just flag diacritics, why not?

!! More processes to describe:
!!
!! * wataa / wadatay dissimilation
!! * a/e alternation in -e nouns (noun type is a bit more complex too, as corpus reveals)
!! * vowel deletion ilig, ilko
!! * e/y alternation in samee- verbs
!! * w/b alternations
!! * vowel lengthening magaalo / magaalooyin



!! Notes:
!! * If forms disappear but the rule should work, make sure
!!   that the pair transforming exists in the Alphabet


!!! The twolc rule file itself

!! Alphabet

Alphabet

 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ‘ ´ ´´ 
 
!! For ease of reduplication and treating sh as separate from l + t => sh

 sh kh dh 
  
 %^V:0
 %^:0
 %{N%}:0
 
 ! Morphophon
 %{%-I%}:0
 %{%-V%}:0
 %{%-a%}:0
 %{%-e%}:0
 %{C2%}
 %{E%}:e
 %{a%}            ! V3B with -a root deletion
 %{a%}:0
 %{ae%}
 %{d%}:d
 %{e%}
 %{m%}
 %{mm%}:m 
 %{n%}:n
 %{o%}
 %{y%}:y

 ! Boundary markers
 ! Ideally %> for root boundary, # for word-final. Pro'lly inconsistent
 ! about this, but something worth going through and checking.
 ! For testing remove :0 to see boundaries
 %>:0
 #:0 
! %:

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <
  
  %-
  ‘:0 !’

! Morpheme boundaries:
 «  ! Derivational prefix
 »  ! Derivational suffix
 %< ! Inflectional prefx
 %> ! Inflectional suffix
 #  ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
 %^ ! (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
 

 %{t%}:t

 ! Trigger for t + d contraction in 3B
 ! Also ablaut blocker
 %{X%}:0
 %{e%} 

;

Sets

 Vowels = a e i o u y %{ae%} %{o%} %{e%} %{a%} ;
 
 BackV =  a e i o u ; ! aa ee ii oo uu ;
 FrontV = ä ë ï ö ü ; ! ää ëë ïï öö üü ; 

 Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z dh %{m%} %{mm%} %{n%} kh sh ‘ ;
 Back = c x h ‘ q kh ;

 TDalt = q kh c x h ‘ d w y ;
 

 VceStop = b d g dh ;
 VcelStop = t k ;

 Letters = a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ‘ ´
            dh sh kh 
            ;

 MorphoPhon =
            # %{m%} %{C2%} %{C3A%} %{C3B%} %{C3C%} %{t%} %{d%} %{X%} 
            %{ae%} %{e%} %{n%} %{o%} %{ATR%} 
            ;
 Tones = ´ ´´ ;

 WordChars = Letters MorphoPhon ;

Definitions
 AllBoundaries = [ #: | %>: | %> | %>: ] ;
 WordBoundary  = #: ;

 TonePattern = [ ´ | ´´ ] ;
 PostN = TonePattern %>: %{N%}:0 ;

!!! Rules

Rules

!! TODO: write tests for gacmahii / gacmihii, magacii / magicii, magucu / magacu

!! TODO: tests from these

!! ```
!! ilig+N+Masc+Pl+Def+PxSg3M+Abs+Prox       il^ik´%>%{N%}a%>híisa#
!!   -- > ilkihiisa 
!! walaal+N+Masc+Pl+Def+PxSg3M+Abs+Prox     walaal´´%>%{N%}a%>híisa#
!!   -- > walaalihiisa 

!! magac+N+Masc+Sg+Def+Abs+Dist                magac´´%>%{N%}kii#
!!   -- > magicii 
!! magac+N+Masc+Sg+Def+Nom+Prox                magac´´%>%{N%}ku#
!!   -- > magucu 
!! magac+N+Masc+Sg+Def+PxSg3F+Abs+Prox      magac´´%>%{N%}kíisa#
!!   -- > magiciisa 
!! waxa+CS+Foc/R+Sg3M      wax%>uu#
!!   -- > wuxuu

!! wax+N+Masc+Sg+Def+PxSg3M+Nom+Prox        wax´´%>%{N%}kíisu#
!!   -- > wixiisu / waxiisu
!! ```

!! List of rules:

! getting waxuu; tone marker blocks.
"Ablaut around back fricatives at morpheme boundaries"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 a:Cy <=> Cons _ Back ( Tones ) PostN ( k:0 ) Cy ;                    !  ?
          Cons _ Back ( Tones ) PostN k:0 Cy ;                        ! magucu
          Cons _ Back ( Tones ) %>: :Cy ;                    ! wuxuu

    where Cy in (u i)

    matched ;

! aabb{-e}{e}´´>{N}h
! aabb{e}´´>{N}hii

"Ablaut in declension 7 with final vowel"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{e%}:Cy <=> Cons (%{%-e%}:0) _ PostN h Cy ;

    where Cy in (u i)

    matched ;


! #LT_SH

"LT -> SH part 1"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 l:s <=> _ ( Tones ) %>: ( %{N%}:0 ) ( %>: ) t: ;
 ! Also for V3B where there is d in triggering environment and interceding {a}
         _ %{a%}:0 ( Tones ) %>: ( %{N%}:0 ) ( %>: ) d: ;
 ! Also for V1 where a vowel deletes
         _ %{%-V%}:0 ( Tones ) %>: ( %>: ) t: ;


"LT -> SH part 2"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 t:h <=> l: ( Tones ) %>: ( %{N%}:0 ) ( %>: ) _ ;
         l: %{%-V%}:0 ( Tones ) %>: ( %{N%}:0 ) ( %>: ) _ ;

         ! In reduplicative plurals where l is reduplicated
         l: PostN [ Vowels | Vowels+ ] %{C2%}:s ( [ %>: | %>:+ ] ) _ ;
         l: Tones %{N%}:0 a %{C2%}:s %>: _ ;
